Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.180

Public stadium authority—Employee positions—Wages and benefits—Insurance of employees, board members.

The public stadium authority shall have authority to create and fill positions, fix wages and salaries, pay costs involved in securing or arranging to secure employees, and establish benefits for employees, including holiday pay, vacations or vacation pay, retirement benefits, medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance, as approved by the board. Public stadium authority board members, at their own expense, shall be entitled to medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance. Insurance for employees and board members shall not be considered compensation. Authority coverage for the board is not to exceed that provided public stadium authority employees.

[ 1997 c 220 s 117 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]